District of Columbia statutes.
29-507

Number of directors.

A professional corporation shall have one or more directors, without regard to the number of shareholders.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-407.
1981 Ed., § 29-607.
1973 Ed., § 29-1107.